Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,115
Additional dealer license plates;
unauthorized use; hearing.

When an applicant applies for
a license, the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board may authorize
the county treasurer to issue additional dealer license plates when
the dealer or manufacturer furnishes satisfactory proof for a need of additional
dealer license plates because of special condition or hardship. In the case
of unauthorized use of dealer license plates by any licensed dealer, the Nebraska
Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board may hold a hearing and after such hearing
may determine that such dealer is not qualified for continued usage of such
dealer license plates for a set period not to exceed one year.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 115;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 70.